Washington statutes.
RCW 26.40.060

Notice, copies, filing of order of commitment.

Upon the issuance of an order for the commitment of a child to custody, the court shall transmit copies thereof to the co-custodians named therein. For the state as co-custodian the copy of such order shall be filed with the department of social and health services whose duty it shall be to notify the state superintendent of public instruction, the state department of social and health services, and such other state departments or agencies as may have services for the child, of the filing of such order, which notice shall be given by the department of social and health services at the time commitment to custody becomes effective under the order.

[ 1982 c 35 s 195; 1979 c 141 s 35; 1955 c 272 s 6.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.